District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.22

Inspection of commodities by Director.

The Director, or under his direction, his assistants and inspectors, shall from time to time weigh or measure and inspect packages or amounts of commodities of whatever kind kept for sale, offered or exposed for sale, sold, or in the process of delivery, in order to determine whether or not the same are kept for sale, offered for sale, or sold in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter, and no person shall refuse to permit such weighing, measuring, or inspection whenever demanded by the Director or any of his assistants or inspectors.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 22
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
1981 Ed., § 10-125.
1973 Ed., § 10-124.
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.